Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1 General Provisions
65-4-117. Regulatory powers of commission — The 2-1-1 collaborative — Statewide 2-1-1 advisory council.

The commission has the power to:

Investigate, upon its own initiative or upon complaint in writing, any matter concerning any public utility as defined in § 65-4-101;

Request the comptroller of the treasury, from time to time, appraise and value the property of any public utility, as defined in § 65-4-101, whenever in the judgment of the commission such appraisal and valuation shall be necessary for the purpose of carrying out any of the provisions of this chapter. The comptroller of the treasury's office is hereby authorized to make such valuation and in that process may have access to and use any books, documents or records in the possession of any department or board of the state or any political subdivision of the state. For purposes of rate regulation the Tennessee public utility commission has the specific authority to have access to books, documents or records in possession of any department or board of the state or any political subdivision of the state;

After hearing, by order in writing, fix just and reasonable standards, classifications, regulations, practices or services to be furnished, imposed, observed and followed thereafter by any public utility;

After hearing, by order in writing, ascertain and fix adequate and serviceable standards for the measurement of quantity, quality, pressure, voltage, or other condition, pertaining to the supply of the product or service rendered by any public utility, and to prescribe reasonable regulations for examination, test and measurement of such product or service;

After hearing, by order in writing, establish reasonable rules and regulations, specifications and standards, to secure accuracy of all meters and appliances for measurements;

Provide for the examination and test of any appliance used for the measuring of any product or service of a public utility, and by its agents or examiners to enter upon any premises occupied by any public utility, for the purpose of making the examination and test provided for in this chapter; and

Fix the fees to be paid by any consumer or user of any product or service of a public utility, who may apply to the commission for such examination or test to be made. Any consumer or user may have any such appliance tested upon the payment of the fees fixed by the commission, which fees shall be repaid to the consumer or user if the appliance be found defective or incorrect to the disadvantage of the consumer or user, and in that event such fees shall be paid by the public utility concerned.

Not later than December 31, 2004, the commission shall designate an entity to be the 2-1-1 collaborative for the state of Tennessee, such 2-1-1 collaborative being designated in order to be qualified to obtain federal grants relating to 2-1-1 service in Tennessee. The commission may designate an entity to be the 2-1-1 collaborative based on either the petition of an entity seeking such designation, or based on the commission's own motion.

There is created a statewide 2-1-1 advisory council consisting of up to eighteen (18) members who shall be appointed by the commission. The Tennessee Alliance of Information and Referral Systems and the United Ways of Tennessee shall submit recommendations to the commission for potential appointees to the advisory council. The advisory council shall be representative of the various 2-1-1 service stakeholders, including, but not limited to, governmental entities, call centers, non-profit organizations, foundations and corporate entities. In making recommendations for appointment to the advisory council, the Tennessee Alliance of Information and Referral Systems and the United Ways of Tennessee shall do so with a conscious intent of selecting persons who reflect a diverse mixture with respect to race and gender.

The 2-1-1 advisory council is charged with advising and assisting the commission in establishing statewide standards that will ensure that the citizens of this state are served by an efficient and effective 2-1-1 service. To that end, the commission is empowered to promulgate rules and regulations that further define the role of the advisory council, that adopt standards for 2-1-1 service and as may otherwise be necessary to implement this subdivision (b)(2).

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3059a87; Code 1932, § 5450; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-424; Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-4-116; Acts 1995, ch. 305, §§ 17, 20; 2004, ch. 762, § 2; 2009, ch. 275, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-4-117, concerning former commission employees, was transferred to § 65-4-118 by Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1, effective Mar. 8, 1993.

Acts 2004, ch. 762, § 1 provided that the title of the act is and may be cited as the “Calling for 2-1-1 Act”.

Acts 2009, ch. 275, § 2 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as requiring or permitting any state funding relative to 2-1-1 service provision, including, but not limited to, reimbursement of any expenses for advisory council members related to their participation on the advisory council.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The commission” for “The authority” and “the commission” for “the authority” throughout; substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in the last sentence of (a)(2); and substituted “the commission's own motion” for “the authority's own motion” at the end of (b)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339 (1947-1948).

65-4-118. Consumer advocate division.

There is created a consumer advocate division in the office of the attorney general and reporter which shall consist of various positions which may include attorneys, accountants/financial analysts, support personnel and other personnel as determined by the attorney general and reporter to be appropriate and necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section. As part of the annual appropriations process, the attorney general and reporter may request the general assembly to increase or eliminate positions within the division. The offices of the division shall be located wherever the attorney general and reporter, in the attorney general and reporter's discretion, shall so choose.

The consumer advocate division has the duty and authority to represent the interests of Tennessee consumers of public utilities services. The division may, with the approval of the attorney general and reporter, participate or intervene as a party in any matter or proceeding before the commission or any other administrative, legislative or judicial body and initiate such proceeding, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and the rules of the commission.

If the consumer advocate division concludes that it is without sufficient information to initiate a proceeding, it may petition the commission, after notice to the affected utility, to obtain information from the utility. The petition shall state with particularity the information sought and the type of proceeding that may be initiated if the information is obtained. Additionally, the consumer advocate division may request information from the commission staff, and, if the commission staff is in possession of the requested information, such information shall be provided within ten (10) days of the request.

If the consumer advocate division initiates an appeal of a commission decision, the defense of the appeal shall be the responsibility of the commission through its legal staff.

The consumer advocate division may enter into agreements regarding the nondisclosure of trade secrets or other confidential commercial information obtained by the division.

The attorney general and reporter shall hire, fire, supervise, direct and control the personnel and activities of the consumer advocate division, and the employees of the division shall be employees of the attorney general and reporter for the purposes of title 8, chapter 6.

The attorney general and reporter shall prepare, each year, a budget for the consumer advocate division for the next fiscal year and submit the budget for inclusion in the attorney general and reporter's budget request for review and final approval by the general assembly. Reports on the operations and other matters relative to the consumer advocate division shall be filed by the attorney general and reporter with the general assembly and other governmental entities.

The division shall be funded from the general fund as appropriated in the general appropriations act.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 3059a108; Code 1932, § 5468; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-434; Acts 1982, ch. 788, § 7; 1993, ch. 23, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-4-117; Acts 1994, ch. 913, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, §§ 18-20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. The consumer advocate division in the office of the attorney general and reporter, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Former § 65-4-118, concerning complaints referred to former commission employees, was transferred to § 65-4-119 by Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1, effective Mar. 8, 1993.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” in subsections (b) and (c).

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. Audits of utilities by consumer advocate division, OAG 95-044, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (4/25/95).

Funding of the consumer advocate division, OAG 97-023, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (3/11/97).

65-4-119. Complaints referred to employees.

Any person employed by the commission in the consumer advocate division may be assigned by the commission to investigate, hear, and, wherever possible, adjust any individual or general complaint made by any person against any such public utility, wherein its investment, property, service charges, or claims preferred against it, may be involved, and may hear and take proof, and, in the event the commission employee is unable to effect a satisfactory adjustment of any such complaint, then the commission employee shall certify the same to the commission, with recommendations in the premises, whereupon the commission shall, after hearing, make its final order, which shall be binding upon the parties to any such controversy.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 3059a109; Code 1932, § 5469; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-435; Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-4-118; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-4-119, concerning penalty for noncompliance was transferred to § 65-4-120 by Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1, effective Mar. 8, 1993.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

65-4-120. Penalty for noncompliance with authority.

Any public utility which violates or fails to comply with any lawful order, judgment, finding, rule, or requirement of the commission, shall in the discretion of the commission be subject to a penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day of any such violation or failure, which may be declared due and payable by the commission, upon complaint, and after hearing, and when paid, either voluntarily, or after suit, which may be brought by the commission, shall be placed to the credit of the public utility account.

Acts 1921, ch. 107, § 10; Shan. Supp., § 3059a114; Code 1932, § 5470; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-436; Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-4-119; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-4-120, concerning appeals, was transferred to § 65-4-121 by Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1, effective Mar. 8, 1993.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

65-4-121. Appeals.

Any appeal, order, decision, ruling or action of the commission affecting any utility as defined in § 65-4-101, exclusive of railroads or common carriers, or any company engaged in the transmission of intelligence or communications, shall be filed in a court of record of competent jurisdiction in the county in which the dispute or matters in controversy arose; and no other nisi prius court of this state shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine such appeal. In the event of an appeal from the judgment or order of circuit or chancery court reviewing such order, or judgment, such appeal shall be prosecuted to the court of appeals in the grand division of the state in which the dispute or matters in controversy arose; and any appeal therefrom shall be perfected to the supreme court.

Acts 1935, ch. 46, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5470.1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-437; Acts 1993, ch. 23, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-4-120; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” preceding “affecting any utility” at the beginning of the section.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, §§ 3, 5.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Appellate Procedure and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (William J. Harbison), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 291 (1976).

65-4-122. Discriminatory charges — Reasonableness of rates — Unreasonable preferences — Penalties.

If any common carrier or public service company, directly or indirectly, by any special rate, rebate, drawback, or other device, charges, demands, collects, or receives from any person a greater or less compensation for any service within this state than it charges, demands, collects, or receives from any other person for service of a like kind under substantially like circumstances and conditions, and if such common carrier or such other public service company makes any preference between the parties aforementioned, such common carrier or other public service company commits unjust discrimination, which is prohibited and declared unlawful.

Any such corporation which charges, collects, or receives more than a just and reasonable rate of toll or compensation for service in this state commits extortion, which is prohibited and declared unlawful.

It is unlawful for any such corporation to make or give an undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to any particular person or locality, or any particular description of traffic or service, or to subject any particular person, company, firm, corporation, or locality, or any particular description of traffic or service to any undue or unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage.

Any such corporation that shall be guilty of extortion or unjust discrimination, or of giving to any person or locality, or to any description of traffic an undue or unreasonable preference or advantage, shall be fined in any sum not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

An action may be brought by any person against any person or corporation, owning or operating such public service company in Tennessee, for the violation of this section, before any court having jurisdiction to try the same.

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 137.

65-4-123. Declaration of telecommunications services policy.

The general assembly declares that the policy of this state is to foster the development of an efficient, technologically advanced, statewide system of telecommunications services by permitting competition in all telecommunications services markets, and by permitting alternative forms of regulation for telecommunications services and telecommunications services providers. To that end, the regulation of telecommunications services and telecommunications services providers shall protect the interests of consumers without unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage to any telecommunications services provider; universal service shall be maintained; and rates charged to residential customers for essential telecommunications services shall remain affordable.

Acts 1995, ch. 408, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Battle for the Book: First-in-the-Nation Ruling Gives Competitors Access to Cover of Bellsouth Directory (Melvin T. Malone and T. Harold Pinkley), 39 No. 7 Tenn. B.J. 18 (2003).

65-4-124. Administrative rules.

All telecommunications services providers shall provide non-discriminatory interconnection to their public networks under reasonable terms and conditions; and all telecommunications services providers shall, to the extent that it is technically and financially feasible, be provided desired features, functions and services promptly, and on an unbundled and non-discriminatory basis from all other telecommunications services providers.

The Tennessee public utility commission shall, at a minimum, promulgate rules and issue such orders as necessary to implement the requirements of subsection (a) and to provide for unbundling of service elements and functions, terms for resale, interLATA presubscription, number portability, and packaging of a basic local exchange telephone service or unbundled features or functions with services of other providers.

These rules shall also ensure that all telecommunications services providers who provide basic local exchange telephone service or its equivalent provide each customer a basic White Pages directory listing, provide access to 911 emergency services, provide free blocking service for 900/976 type services, provide access to telecommunications relay services, provide Lifeline and Link-Up Tennessee services to qualifying citizens of the state and provide educational discounts existing on June 6, 1995.

The granting of applications for certificates of convenience and necessity to competing telecommunications service providers or the adoption of a price regulation plan for incumbent local exchange telephone companies is not dependent upon the promulgation of these rules.

Acts 1995, ch. 408, § 8; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The Tennessee public utility commission” for “The Tennessee regulatory authority” at the beginning of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-125. Changes in telecommunications service provider — Regulation — Enforcement — Surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit.

No telecommunications service provider, and no person acting on behalf of any telecommunications service provider, shall designate or change the provider of telecommunications services to a subscriber if the provider or person acting on behalf of the provider knows or reasonably should know that such provider or person does not have the authorization of such subscriber.

No telecommunications service provider, and no person acting on behalf of any telecommunications service provider, shall bill and collect from any subscriber to telecommunications services any charges for services to which the provider or person acting on behalf of the provider knows or reasonably should know such subscriber has not subscribed, or any amount in excess of that specified in the tariff or contract governing the charges for such services.

The Tennessee public utility commission shall establish a consumer complaint form on the Internet for reporting telecommunications service providers or persons acting on their behalf who charge the provider of telecommunications services in violation of this section. Any Internet sites which are maintained by the commission, the general assembly or the governor's office shall contain a link to such form.

The Tennessee public utility commission shall adopt rules implementing this section, including, without limitation, rules specifying the manner in which subscriber authorization may be obtained and confirmed.

The Tennessee public utility commission may entertain and decide complaints and issue orders, including, without limitation, show cause orders, to enforce this section and its rules against any telecommunications service provider, or any person acting on behalf of any telecommunications service provider.

A telecommunications provider or person acting on behalf of a telecommunications provider who violates any provision of this section, any regulation promulgated pursuant to this section or any order issued to enforce the provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day of any such violation. Such civil penalty shall be due and payable to the commission and shall be credited to the public utility account. The commission shall consider mitigating factors as raised by the telecommunications service provider in assessing the amount of the civil penalty. The commission shall allocate at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the revenue collected from such civil penalty for consumer education.

Any telecommunications provider or person acting on behalf of a telecommunications provider who violates this section or regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall pay damages to each subscriber affected by such conduct in an amount equal to all charges and fees for services for which the subscriber has not subscribed, including all amounts in excess of allowable charges for such services, and any cost incurred to reinstate the subscriber's original telecommunications service.

This section shall not have the effect of amending or superseding any provisions of the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act of 1977, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1.

This section shall not have the effect of superseding any existing rules of the Tennessee public utility commission, or any order or proceeding to enforce such existing rules. Any such existing rules shall remain in effect until such time as the Tennessee public utility commission adopts new rules pursuant to this section.

By September 1, 2000, all telecommunications service providers subject to the control and jurisdiction of the commission, except those owners or operators of public telephone service who pay annual inspection and supervision fees pursuant to § 65-4-301(b), or any telecommunications service provider that owns and operates equipment facilities in Tennessee with a value of more than five million dollars ($5,000,000), shall file with the commission a corporate surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit in the amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) to secure the payment of any monetary sanction imposed in any enforcement proceeding, brought under this title or the Consumer Telemarketing Protection Act of 1990, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 15, by or on behalf of the commission.

Acts 1998, ch. 709, §§ 1-5; 2000, ch. 586, §§ 1-3; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”, “the commission” for “the authority”, and “The commission” for “The authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-126. State policy on using energy more efficiently.

The general assembly declares that the policy of this state is that the Tennessee public utility commission will seek to implement, in appropriate proceedings for each electric and gas utility, with respect to which the commission has rate making authority, a general policy that ensures that utility financial incentives are aligned with helping their customers use energy more efficiently and that provides timely cost recovery and a timely earnings opportunity for utilities associated with cost-effective measurable and verifiable efficiency savings, in a way that sustains or enhances utility customers' incentives to use energy more efficiently.

Acts 2009, ch. 531, § 53; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” and “the commission” for “the authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.